Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3524
Homestead; exemption; categories; Department of Revenue; maintain statistics.

The Department of Revenue shall maintain statistics to demonstrate the number of claimants and the amount of relief granted for the categories of homestead exemption.

Laws 1979, LB 65, § 24;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 26;

Laws 1983, LB 396, § 6;

Laws 1984, LB 956, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1039, § 10.